Maine, session 132, LD1917.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §2261, sub-§6, as repealed and replaced by PL 2023, c. 639, §1,
is amended to read:
6. Eligible criminal conviction. "Eligible criminal conviction" means:
A. A conviction for a current or former Class E crime, except a conviction for a current
or former Class E crime under Title 17‑A, chapter 11; and
B. A conviction for a crime when the crime was committed prior to January 30, 2017
for:
(1) Aggravated trafficking, furnishing or cultivation of scheduled drugs under
Title 17‑A, former section 1105 when the person was convicted of cultivating
scheduled drugs, the scheduled drug was marijuana and the crime committed was
a Class D crime;
(2) Aggravated cultivating of marijuana under Title 17‑A, section 1105‑D,
subsection 1, paragraph A, subparagraph (4);
(3) Aggravated cultivating of marijuana under Title 17‑A, section 1105‑D,
subsection 1, paragraph B‑1, subparagraph (4);
(4) Aggravated cultivating of marijuana under Title 17‑A, section 1105‑D,
subsection 1, paragraph D, subparagraph (4); and
(5) Unlawful possession of a scheduled drug under Title 17‑A, former section
1107 when that drug was marijuana and the underlying crime was a Class D crime.;
and
C. A conviction for conduct that subsequent to the conviction is no longer a crime.
Sec. 2. 15 MRSA §2262, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 674, §1, is amended to
read:
2. Time since sentence fully satisfied. At least 4 years have passed since the person
has fully satisfied each of the sentencing alternatives imposed under Title 17‑A, section
1502, subsection 2 for the eligible criminal conviction, except that a post-judgment motion
to seal criminal history record information may be filed immediately upon fully satisfying
each sentencing alternative for any conviction for conduct that subsequent to the conviction
is no longer a crime;